Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,178
Payment.

(MBCA 13.24) (a) Except as provided in section
21-2,179, within thirty days after the form required by subdivision (b)(2)(ii)
of section 21-2,176 is due, the corporation shall pay in cash to those shareholders
who complied with subsection (a) of section 21-2,177 the amount the corporation
estimates to be the fair value of their shares, plus interest.

(b) The payment to each shareholder
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section must be accompanied by:

(1)(i) The annual financial
statements specified in subsection (a) of section 21-2,227 of the corporation
that issued the shares to be appraised, which shall be of a date ending not
more than sixteen months before the date of payment and shall comply with
subsection (b) of section 21-2,227, except that if such annual financial statements
are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent
financial information, and (ii) the latest available quarterly financial statements
of such corporation, if any;

(2)
A statement of the corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares,
which estimate must equal or exceed the corporation's estimate given pursuant
to subdivision (b)(2)(iii) of section 21-2,176; and

(3) A statement that shareholders described
in subsection (a) of this section have the right to demand further payment
under section 21-2,180 and that if any such shareholder does not do so within
the time period specified therein, such shareholder shall be deemed to have
accepted such payment in full satisfaction of the corporation's obligations
under sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 178.
January 1, 2016